apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.en.dix
<pardef n="cost__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>          
    
<pardef n="b/uy__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uy</l>
          <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uy</l>
          <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uys</l>
          <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uying</l>
          <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uying</l>
          <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uying</l>
          <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="ca/tch__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tch</l>
          <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tch</l>
          <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tches</l>
          <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ught</l>
          <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ught</l>
          <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tching</l>
          <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tching</l>
          <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tching</l>
          <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="chid/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>        
    
<pardef n="cho/ose__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oses</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>sen</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osing</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osing</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osing</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="cl/ing__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ings</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ung</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ung</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    
<pardef n="cl/othe__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othe</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othe</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othes</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    
<pardef n="control__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>led</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>led</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

<e lm="buy"><i>b</i><par n="b/uy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="catch"><i>ca</i><par n="ca/tch__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="choose"><i>cho</i><par n="cho/ose__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="control"><i>control</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cost"><i>cost</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fulfil"><i>fulfil</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="read"><i>read</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="travel"><i>travel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dispel"><i>dispel</i> <par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="expel"><i>expel</i> <par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="label"><i>label</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enrol"><i>enrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enrol"><i>enrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="propel"><i>propel</i><par n="control__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="repel"><i>repel</i><par n="control__vblex" /></e>
